Ohio, session 136, HB695.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 305.44, 505.96, 731.142, and 733.241 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 305.44. (A) As used in this section, "nondisclosure agreement" means an agreement or contract that includes a provision or clause that prohibits a member of the board of county commissioners from disclosing, discussing, describing, or commenting on county matters related to the member's official duties. (B) No member of a board of county commissioners shall knowingly enter into a nondisclosure agreement. (C) A member who violates this section is subject to a civil fine of not more than one thousand dollars. The attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. (D) An agreement or contract entered into in violation of this section is void and unenforceable. Sec. 505.96. (A) As used in this section, "nondisclosure agreement" means an agreement or contract that includes a provision or clause that prohibits a member of the board of township trustees from disclosing, discussing, describing, or commenting on township matters related to the member's official duties. (B) No member of a board of township trustees shall knowingly enter into a nondisclosure agreement. (C) A member who violates this section is subject to a civil fine of not more than one thousand dollars. The attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. (D) An agreement or contract entered into in violation of this section is void and unenforceable. Sec. 731.142. (A) As used in this section, "nondisclosure agreement" means an agreement or contract that includes a provision or clause that prohibits a member of the village legislative authority from disclosing, discussing, describing, or commenting on village matters related to the member's official duties. (B) No member of a village legislative authority shall knowingly enter into a nondisclosure agreement. (C) A member who violates this section is subject to a civil fine of not more than one thousand dollars. The attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. (D) An agreement or contract entered into in violation of this section is void and unenforceable. Sec. 733.241. (A) As used in this section, "nondisclosure agreement" means an agreement or contract that includes a provision or clause that prohibits the village mayor from disclosing, discussing, describing, or commenting on village matters related to the mayor's official duties. (B) No village mayor shall knowingly enter into a nondisclosure agreement. (C) A village mayor who violates this section is subject to a civil fine of not more than one thousand dollars. The attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. (D) An agreement or contract entered into in violation of this section is void and unenforceable. Section 2. Sections 305.44, 505.96, 731.142, and 733.241 of the Revised Code as enacted by this act apply to a nondisclosure agreement that is entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.